District of Columbia statutes.
48-843.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “pharmaceutical product” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 3-1201.02(10A)(B)(iii).

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 402, 55 DCR 1659

History